Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2894.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; rural school bus routes study The sum of $2,880,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the northern Arizona council of governments for a rural school bus routes study.